Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1015
Cosmetologist, defined.

Cosmetologist means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to perform all of the practices of cosmetology.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-350;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 277.